Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-555
Public records; access; other rights.

Holders of certificates of authority and their employees in the conduct of the business of abstracting shall have access to the public records in any office of any city, county, or the state, shall be permitted to make memoranda, notations, or copies of such records, and shall be permitted to occupy reasonable space with equipment for that purpose, subject to the reasonable regulation of the custodian of such public records and during the business hours of such office, in order to enable such certificate holders to make and prepare abstracts and to compile, post, copy, and maintain their books, records, and indices.

Laws 1965, c. 453, § 17, p. 1443;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 76-525;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 25.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).